Vermont, session 2025-2026, H381.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4028 is added to read:
§ 4028. GAS-OPERATED SEMIAUTOMATIC FIREARMS PROHIBITED
(a)(1) A person shall not manufacture, transfer, offer for sale, purchase, or
receive or import into this State any of the following firearms, devices, or
combinations of parts:
(A) a firearm that is included on the list of prohibited gas-operated
semiautomatic firearms published by the Attorney General pursuant to
subsection (e) of this section;
VT LEG #379203 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.381
2025 Page 2 of 6
(B) a modified nonprohibited firearm that, as modified, operates as a
firearm included on the list of prohibited gas-operated semiautomatic firearms
published by the Attorney General pursuant to subsection (e) of this section;
(C) a combination of parts that is designed and functions to modify
an otherwise nonprohibited firearm so that the firearm, as modified, operates as
a gas-operated semiautomatic firearm included on the list of prohibited gas-
operated semiautomatic firearms published by the Attorney General pursuant
to subsection (e) of this section;
(D) a combination of parts that is designed to be assembled into a
firearm that operates as a firearm included on the list of prohibited gas-
operated semiautomatic firearms published by the Attorney General pursuant
to subsection (e) of this section; or
(E) a combination of parts that functions to produce a gas-operated
semiautomatic cycling action.
(2) As used in this subsection, “import” does not include the
transportation back into this State of a gas-operated semiautomatic firearm by
the same person who transported the weapon out of State if the person
possessed it on or before the effective date of this section.
(b) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be imprisoned
for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #379203 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.381
2025 Page 3 of 6
(c) The prohibition on transfer, sale, and purchase of gas-operated
semiautomatic firearms established by subsection (a) of this section shall not
apply to a gas-operated semiautomatic firearm lawfully possessed by a
licensed dealer as defined in subdivision 4019(a)(4) of this title prior to the
effective date of this act and transferred by the dealer on or before October 1,
2025.
(d)(1) This section shall not apply to a gas-operated semiautomatic firearm:
(A) manufactured for, transferred to, or received by the United States
or a department or agency of the United States, or by any state or by a
department, agency, or political subdivision of a state;
(B) transferred to or received by a federal law enforcement officer or
a law enforcement officer certified as a law enforcement officer by the
Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358, for legitimate
law enforcement purposes;
(C) transferred to or received by a member of the U.S. Armed Forces
or the Vermont National Guard acting within the course of the member’s
official duties;
(D) transferred to a licensee under Title I of the Atomic Energy Act
of 1954 for purposes of establishing and maintaining an on-site physical
protection system and security organization required by federal law, or
possessed by an employee or contractor of such a licensee on-site for these
VT LEG #379203 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.381
2025 Page 4 of 6
purposes, or off-site for purposes of licensee-authorized training or
transportation of nuclear materials; or
(E) transferred to or received by one immediate family member from
another immediate family member.
(e)(1) On or before October 1, 2025, the Attorney General, in consultation
with the Commissioner of Public Safety, shall publish on its website a list of
gas-operated semiautomatic firearms that satisfy the definition of that term
contained in subsection (f) of this section. The Attorney General shall update
the list required by this subsection on or before October 1 of each year.
(2) Within 60 days after publication of the list of gas-operated
semiautomatic firearms by the Attorney General pursuant to this subsection, an
owner or manufacturer of a gas-operated semiautomatic firearm may appeal its
inclusion on the list to the Civil Division of the Superior Court pursuant to
Rule 75 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(3) The Department of Public Safety shall ensure all federally licensed
firearms dealers in Vermont are provided with a copy of the list of gas-
operated semiautomatic firearms published by the Attorney General pursuant
to this subsection.
(f) As used in this section:
(1) “Cycle the action” means to extract the fired cartridge case, chamber
the next cartridge, and prepare the firing mechanism to fire again.
VT LEG #379203 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.381
2025 Page 5 of 6
(2) “Gas-operated” means any firearm that harnesses or traps a portion
of the high-pressure gas from a fired cartridge to cycle the action using:
(A) a long stroke piston, in which gas is vented from the barrel to a
piston that is mechanically fixed to the bolt group and moves to cycle the
action;
(B) a short stroke piston, in which gas is vented from the barrel to a
piston that moves separately from the bolt group so that the energy is imparted
through a gas piston to cycle the action;
(C) a system that traps and vents gas from either the barrel or the
chamber to directly strike or impinge the bolt, bolt carrier, or slide assembly to
unlock and cycle the action;
(D) a hybrid system that combines elements of a system described in
subdivision (C) of this subdivision (2) with a system described in subdivision
(A) or (B) of this subdivision (2) to capture gas vented from the barrel to cycle
the action; or
(E) a blowback-operated system that directly uses the expanding
gases of the ignited propellant powder acting on the cartridge case to drive the
breechblock or breech bolt rearward.
(3) “Immediate family member” means a spouse, parent, stepparent,
child, stepchild, sibling, stepsibling, grandparent, step-grandparent, grandchild,
VT LEG #379203 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.381
2025 Page 6 of 6
step-grandchild, great-grandparent, step-great-grandparent, great-grandchild,
and step-great-grandchild.
(4) “Machine gun” has the same meaning as in Section 5845(b) of the
National Firearms Act, 26 U.S.C. § 5845(b), and includes a semiautomatic
firearm that has been modified in any way that:
(A) materially increases the rate of fire of the firearm; or
(B) approximates the action or rate of fire of a machine gun.
(5) “Semiautomatic firearm” means any firearm that:
(A) upon initiating the firing sequence, fires the first chambered
cartridge and uses a portion of the energy of the firing cartridge to:
(i) extract the expended cartridge case;
(ii) chamber the next round; and
(iii) prepare the firing mechanism to fire again; and
(B) requires a separate pull, release, push, or initiation of the trigger
to fire each cartridge; and
(C) is not a machine gun.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on October 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379203 v.1